California, session 20252026, AB2104.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6600.2 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:6600.2. (a) (1) A court presiding over any proceeding held pursuant to this article that is open to the public shall provide the public with a remote access option that allows members of the public to remotely observe the proceeding.(2) If a court is unable to provide a remote access option that includes video due to technological limitations that are not reasonably within the control of the court, the court shall make the audio of the proceeding accessible to the public, until January 1, 2028, at which time all courts shall provide a remote access option with a visual feed.(b) This section does not make a hearing open to the public that would not otherwise be open to the public. This section does not interfere with a court’s ability to determine whether or when a proceeding is public.(c) For the purposes of this section, “technological limitations” means a lack of video cameras, microphones, or streaming capability.